id language idiom type genlang_point map form value1 feature1 chapter source page comment contributor date example_as_in_source example translation_as_in_source translation gloss_as_in_source gloss example_source example_page example_comment 1 Upper Andi Andi village yes yes R=gu emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker cercvadze1965 345 In numerals from 21 to 99 -lo-gu is used in between decimals and ones (č'ec'ol-lo-gu-č'e-gu '22'). According to the source, -lo-gu- means 'with', so '22' is 'twenty with two'. Apparently, usually in Andi =gu can appear in a compound numeral more than once. This is not true for Rikvani Andi. In compound numerals from 11 to 19 genitive/locative marker is used on decimals: hoc'oƛi-se-b '11'. In Zilo village, dative marker is used instead of genitive (hoc'olɬ:ij-), in villages Muni and Kvankhidatli another stem of unknown origin is used (hoc'ol[i]). «В мунибском говоре <…> выделяется классный суффикс в числительном лъо-йи (I-II кл.), лъо-ви (III кл.) ‘три’» [alekseevetal1998: 228]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 l‘ob-gu ɬob=gu 3 three three=NUM cercvadze1965 345 2 Upper Andi Rikvani village no yes R=gu emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker suleymanov1957 304 #ERROR! Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 гьоцIолI чIегу hoc'o-ƛ č'e=gu 12 twelve ten-GEN two=NUM suleymanov1957 299 3 Upper Andi Gagatli village no yes R=gu emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker salimov2010 132 #ERROR! Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 гьоцIолIи чIегу hoc'o-ƛi č'e=gu 12 twelve ten-? two=NUM salimov2010 131 4 Upper Andi Zilo village no yes R=gu emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker kayeetaldraft2020 14 In compound numerals from 21 to 99, suffix -loj is used (hoƛ’u-c'ol-loj ĩšdu-gu '75' seven-ten-LNK five-NUM). In compound numerals from 11 to 19, suffix -ɬij is used in the same way (hoc'o-ɬij č'e-gu '12' ten-LNK two-NUM). Source notices that some speakers, especially the youth, use =gu with oziru/ozuru '1 000', borrowed from Turkic. Zilo speaker, asked by Aigul Zakirova in Dec 2021, who was not particularly young, always used -gu with '100' and '1000'. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 ɬob-c’ol-gu ɬob-c'ol=gu thirty thirty three-ten-NUM kayeetaldraft2020 14 glossing c'a, c'o, c'ali as 'ten' because [tatevosov1996: 29] writes that for Godoberi, «both c’a and c’ali are likely to be etymologically related to hac’a ‘10’» (even though «it seems to be rather awkward to treat them as allomorphs of hac’a») 5 Lower Andi Kvankhidatli village no yes R=gu emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Hajimurat, consultant on Kvankhidatli, A. Zakirova p.c. Only numerals in range 100—1000 were asked. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 бешено-гу кIотIу bešeno-gu k'ot'u 100 лошадей 100 horses hundred-NUM horse Hajimurat, consultant on Kvankhidatli, asked by A. Zakirova writing and transcription might be slightly inexact, by A. Zakirova in the field 6 Lower Andi Muni village yes yes R emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker consultant on Muni, A. Zakirova p.c. No -gu is attested. Only numerals in range 100—1000 were asked. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 бешену кIорту bešenu k'ortu 100 лошадей 100 horses hundred horse consultant on Muni, asked by A. Zakirova writing and transcription might be slightly inexact, by A. Zakirova in the field 7 Avar Standard Avar language yes yes R=go emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker forkerdraft2020 18 #ERROR! Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 k'i-q'o=go k'i-q'o=go forty forty two-twenty=NUM forkerdraft2020 18 8 Avar Zaqatala dialect_nt1 no yes R=gu emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker saidova2007 107 #ERROR! Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 инцIила кIигу inc'ila k'i=gu 12 twelve ten two=NUM saidova2007 108 glossing needs revision 9 Chamalal Upper Gakvari dialect_toplevel yes yes R=da emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker bokarev1949b 73 #ERROR! Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 лъалъада ɬaɬa=da 3 three three=NUM bokarev1949b 71 Root for 'three' is from Upper Gakvari subdialect. The whole root is ɬaɬa, no reduplication. 10 Tindi Tindi village yes yes R=da emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker magomedova2012 144 #ERROR! Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 гьацIала боъойа hac'a-la boʔ'o=ja четырнадцать fourteen ten-LOC four=NUM magomedova2012 145 transcription and glossing need revision 11 Godoberi Godoberi language yes yes R=da emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker tatevosov1996 28 #ERROR! Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 inLi-da inƛi=da 6 six six=NUM tatevosov1996 28 12 Northern Akhvakh Northern Akhvakh language yes yes R-da-e mixed Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker magomedbekova1967 71 According to the source, -da is a suffix of adjectives. It appears in all cardinals except the ones that end with če-CM '1', including it itself [magomedovaabdulaeva2007: 686]. In fast colloquial speech class marker -CM is often omitted. Unlike in Southern Akhvakh, -da cannot be omitted [41]. Apparently, -da and class marker do not repeat in a complex numeral and appear only on the end of it [examples on page 71]. Ordinals inflect the way adjectives do [72]. =da appears in azaro-da '1000', as shown by [creisselsdraft2020: 17] (no mentions of millions and larger). The -da-CM-e might originate in participle ida-CM-e 'being' [67]. Confusion: [magomedbekova1967: 41] mentions that in Southern Akhvakh cardinals do not inflect by class. It is unclear whether she means that the -CM suffix is absent in these cardinals. No examples are given. [creisselsdraft2020: 16], however, mentions the same thing but attributes this feature to Northern Akhvakh. He gives many examples, all of them without class suffix. Also, [creisselsdraft2020: 17] shows examples of ordinals without the class marker which is present in [magomedovaabdulaeva2007: 687]. This problem needs help. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 ḳeda-be k'e-da-be два two two-NUM-CM magomedbekova1967 71 transcription and glossing need revision; glossing -da as NUM, but worth mentioning that the source says it is adjective suffix [magomedbekova1967: 40]. [creisselsdraft2020: 10] says that 'no particular function can be attributed' to it. 13 Northern Akhvakh Tad-Magitl' village no yes R-da emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker magomedovaabdulaeva2007 686 In Southern Akhvakh all cardinals inflect by class. -da is a suffix of adjectives. It appears in all cardinals except the ones that end with če-CMe '1', including it itself [magomedbekova1967: 40]. Cardinals do not have class inflection. Suffix -da is omitted «when counting» [magomedbekova1967: 41]. Apparently, -da and class marker do not repeat in a complex numeral and appear only at the end of it. Ordinals inflect the way adjectives do [magomedbekova1967: 72]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 ĩƛːida ĩƛ:i-da 6 six six-NUM creisselsdraft2020 16 transcription and glossing need revision 14 Karata Karata dialect_toplevel yes yes R-da emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker magomedbekova1971 93 -da is used for all numerals, except the ones that end with ce-CM '1', including ce-CM '1' itself. In fast speech it is usually omitted in other numerals, too. In Rabachalda subdialect it can be omitted in slow speech, too. In complex numerals it can be used only once, in the end of the whole numeral. ce-CM '1' is the only numeral with class marker. In Karata, Rachabalda and Lower Inxelo subdialects numeral roots can merge with each other and -da (like boʔ-ac'a-da => boʔazda). It attaches to azar-da '1000', no info on larger numbers. (However, [pasquereaudraft2020: 20] lists ʔazar as not having -da.) In Anchikh subdialect, -da undergoes phonetic alternation -ra in an intervocal position. In Tokitin, root for 'two' is reduplicated in all numerals: k'ek'i [95]. Cardinals inflect the way adjectives do, they inflect only if substantivized [99]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 hač̣wada hač'ʷa-da 9 nine nine-NUM magomedbekova1971 93 transcription needs revision. transcribing as labialized /č'ʷ/ as in [pasquereaudraft2020: 19] 15 Karata Anchiq dialect_toplevel no yes R-ra emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker magomedbekova1971 95 -da turns into -ra when /d/ is in the intervocal position. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 anl'ira anƛi-ra шесть six six-NUM magomedbekova1971 95 transcription needs revision 16 Tukita Tukita language yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker magomedbekova1971 95 In Tokitin subdialect suffix -da is usually not used. In hundreds and thousands, suffix -la is used to bind. The vigesimal system is present. Cardinals inflect the way adjectives do, they inflect only if substantivized [99]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 hač̣wa hač'ʷa 9 nine nine magomedbekova1971 95 transcription needs revision 17 Botlikh Botlikh village yes yes R-da emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker azaev2000 355 -da is used for all numerals, except the ones that end with ce-CM '1', including ce-CM '1' itself. In complex numerals it can be used only once, in the end of the whole numeral. -da is used with azaru '1 000', no info on larger numbers. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 бугъуда buɣu-da четыре four four-NUM azaev2000 355 transcription needs revision 18 Bagvalal Kvanada village yes yes R-da emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker tatevosov2001numerals 155 -da is used for all numerals, except the ones that end with ce-CM '1', including ce-CM '1' itself. It is absent in decimals 20—90 and hundreds 200—900. In complex numerals -ra might be optional (see example on '22') [page 156]. It seems that in complex numerals it can be used only once, in the end of the whole numeral. When after consonants, it is -da, in other cases it is -ra. -da is used with azar '1 000', no info on larger numbers. The source says that suffix -la can be added after -da. He argues with Gudava (1967) as Gudava had claimed that -la numerals are collective numerals. [tatevosov2001numerals] says that these are not collective and, in fact, they do not differ from usual -da cardinals in semantics. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 bū-ra bu:-ra четыре four four-NUM tatevosov2001numerals 155 also can be buʔu-ra 19 Tsez Kidero dialect_nt1 yes yes R-no unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker bokarev1959 202 Exception: sis '1' does not have -no. The suffix is not attached to cardinals 11–19, although there is an alternative way to derivate those, which has the suffix. In complex numerals it can appear more than once (for example, хъунохъу оцIино '50'). It seems that numerals бишон '100' and гIазар '1000' do not accept -no. It is said that -no is equivalent to Avar =go. Cardinals undergo inflection when substantivized. If used with a noun, cardinals attach -ra instead of -no (for example, билI-ра '8' — билI-но); sis '1' becomes si-ra '1'. [polinskydraft2015: 17] marks -ra as oblique case marker. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 хъуно сис χu-no sis двадцать один twenty one twenty-NUM one bokarev1959tsez 202 transcription needs revision. The source [177] claims that хъ is an uvular affricate. But there is no such phoneme in IPA, is there… 20 Khwarshi Kvantlada village yes yes R-no unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker khalilova2009 169 It seems that -no is lost. It is present in several numerals (ħono '3', ɬɨno / ɬuno '5', quno '20') but it is not interpreted as a morpheme anymore, apparently. Quno '20' loses -no when vigecimals are multiplied (for example, q’ˤʷene-qu two-twenty). Numerals 50—90 are borrowed from Andi, presumably from Tindi. «In complex numerals, all components except the last one (and except the numeral quno ‘twenty’) receive the particle -n» (for example, ɬɨno bešon-un q’ˤʷenequ-n ɬɨno '545'). When substantivized, cardinals «distinguish between absolutive and other oblique forms», the latter have special roots [174]. Oblique form: R-la. «When the numeral is used attributively it distinguishes two forms: Absolutive and oblique. The oblique form is formed by adding the oblique suffix -la to the numerals, except for the numeral one and two which have irregular oblique forms» (hada '1', q’ˤʷana '2'). The last consonant of the root is often geminated when -la is added. All numerals which have -no lose it when adding -la (for example, łuno – łulla '5'). Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 oⁿče õče nine nine nine khalilova2009 169 21 Hinuq Hinuq language yes yes R-no unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker forker2013 394 «Cardinal numbers have a direct and an oblique stem. As with adjectives, the oblique stem is used if they modify a noun in an oblique case, or if the number has been substantivized. <…> The numeral ‘one’ has a suppletive oblique stem» (hes '1', seda '1.OBL'). Oblique stem for numeral 'two' is actually kind of suppletive, too (q'ono '2', q'ʷena '2.OBL'). «The numbers from three to ten show all the same suffix, -no, which is replaced by -ra in the oblique form» ('2' has -no). '-no repeats when deriving complex numerals (for example, oc'e-no uq'i-no '14') [396]. bišon '100 and ʡazal '1000' do not have -no and -ra suffixes by default but they receive them when used in a compound numeral [398]. Larger numerals are borrowed from Russian. They do not have an oblique stem (i. e., do not have -ra). Unclear whether they accept -no (no description, no examples). Oblique form: R-ra. For numerals 11—19: «for the oblique stem, at least the unit is, but usually both numerals are, in the oblique form». For numerals larger than 19: «for some speakers, all numerals must be in the oblique form as in the list below. For other speakers, all but the first numeral take the oblique form, e.g. '70' ɫono qura oc'era. The only rules seem to be that (i) the last number must be in the oblique form, and (ii) if one of the numerals appears in the oblique form, then all numerals to the right must also appear in the oblique form» [396]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 iɬno iɬ-no 6 six six-NUM forker2013 394 22 Hunzib Hunzib language yes yes R-n(o) unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker vandenberg1995 68 «Cardinal numbers distinguish nominative and oblique stems. Most numerals up to 10 and the numeral 20 have final -n(o) in the nominative and final -(e)l in the oblique forms». Exceptions: hə̃s '1', q'an.u '2', łɑ.nɑ '3'. «All non-final elements in complex numerals take the ending -n(o); only the final element shows a nominative or oblique form» (this is somewhat misleading: in oblique forms all non-final elements take -no, and in nominative forms all elements take -no. Oblique form: R-(e)l. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 iλ.no iɬ-no 6 six six-NUM vandenberg1995 69 transcription needs revision 23 Bezhta Bezhta village yes yes R-na unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker madieva1965 105 Exception: гьõс '1' (it also has a unique oblique form, сид). -na appears in the middle of the numeral and repeats (for example, ацIо-на къо-на '12' [comrieetal2015: 293]). Strangely, there seems to be no gravity towards the end of a numeral. Numerals 30, 40, … 90 have -na inside them (лъи-на-йиг '50'), as well as hundreds (льи-на-чIитI '500'). Decimals, hundreds, thousands do not have -na when they are on their own but they take it when in a complex numeral (лъана йигна гьõс '31'). So, -na is also kind of used to bind parts of complex numerals. [comrieetal2015: 295] expresses the same idea by saying that «each component of a complex numeral is binded by -na». Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 лъина ɬi-na пять five five-NUM madieva1965 104 24 Northern Dargwa Aqusha dialect_toplevel yes yes R-al unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker abdullaev1954 135 Diachronically, it's -al but in modern-day Dargwa the suffix merges with the root phonetically, in many cases replacing /a/ with another vowel. Exception: ca '1' doesn't have the suffix. It is not used in complex numerals at all. Only in simple numerals, including units, decimals, hundreds etc ('2', '20', '100'). In decimals 30—90 the ending is -ali (for example, хIяб-цI-али '30'). In specific cases (for example, in a childs' play) -al can be omitted in simple numerals, too. In азир '1000', миллион 'million' there is no -al [136] but full forms are used to denote number of thousands (кIел азир '2000') [137]. Additional suffix -ra expresses definiteness (for example, кIел-ра 'the two') [137]. This suffix is also used to end complex numerals with unit '1' (for example, гъану цара '21'). Hundreds are connected using -lim (даршлим ца '101'), which means 'above'. Also, [136] mentions that consonants /v/, /d/ in the beginning of some numerals probably used to be class markers but nowadays they are just parts of respective roots. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 хIяб-ал ħab-al 3 three three-NUM abdullaev1954 135 transcription needs revision 25 Northern Dargwa Meusisha dialect_toplevel no yes R-al unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker gasanova1971 76 Usishi cardinal forms are more «archaic» than in standard Dargwa. For example, in numerals 'two' and 'five' the marker is not merged into the root as it is in Akusha Dargwa. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 кIив-ал k'iw-al два two two-NUM gasanova1971 76 26 Muira Gulli village yes yes R-al unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker gasanova1971 224 Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 хIябал ħab-al — three three-NUM gasanova1971 224 27 Southwestern Dargwa Tanti dialect_toplevel yes yes R-al unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker sumbatovalander2014 95 «Количественные числительные используются при указании на количество объектов. Как правило, они используются в составе именных групп, в составе сказуемых, а также в арифметических примерах. Выступая в сочетании с квантифицируемым именем (независимо от падежа именной группы) или в качестве самостоятельной именной группы в абсолютивном падеже, количественные формы маркируются суффиксом -al». Exception: sa '1'. -al is used only in simple numerals 2—9 (complex numerals end with additive -ra) and in thousands in complex numerals (for example, aʁ˳-al azir-lib хu.darš '4500') [94]. When counting, stems without -al are used [94]. «При присоединении к числительным аддитивной клитики =ra возникает собирательное значение ʻвсе’» (for example, č’-al=ra 'both') [99]. Another =ra is also used in the end of complex numerals, maybe it is the same one? Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 ʕaˁb-al ʕaˁb-al три three три-CARD three-NUM sumbatovalander2014 95 glossing -al as CARD as in the source 28 Sanzhi-Itsari Itsari dialect_toplevel yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker sumbatovamutalov2003 45 Alas, it seems that Itsari numerals have lost their suffixes. «When used without a head noun, numerals can be declined. In general, their declination follows the nominal pattern (declination type 2, consonant-final)». Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 irč'em irč'em nine nine nine sumbatovamutalov2003 45 29 Sanzhi-Itsari Sanzhi dialect_toplevel no yes R-al unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker forker2020dargwa 129 «All numerals except for ca ‘one’ are morphologically complex, containing a root and a derivational suffix. The numerals 2 to 10, 20, as well as 100 are formed by means of the suffix -al (allomorph -jal after vowels). The decimal numerals 10 and 30–90 are built by adding the suffix -c’al to the roots. When decimals and the numerals 1–9 are combined, both the decimals and the numerals 1–9 take suffixes. On the decimals -al is replaced by -nu/-anu, e.g. wec’-al ‘10’ [turns into] wec’-nu [+ units] <…>. To the numerals 1–9 the suffix -ra is added». Thus, -al appears only in 1—9 and tens 10—100. Also, numeral azir '1000' does not have the suffix but numbers of thousands have (for example, ʁa-jal azir '20 000') [130]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 ʡaˤb-al ʡaˤb-al 3 three three-NUM forker2020dargwa 130 30 Mehweb Mehweb language yes yes R-al unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker magometov1982 58 «Простые числительные, составляющие первый десяток, <…> за исключением единицы, имеют суффикс -al, который в кубачинском почти утрачен, в мегебском же он оформляет и сложные числительные» (for example, wec̣-nu-ḳwi-ra-l '12' [59]). «В урахинском, как и в других диалектах, в аналогичных случаях сложное числительное не имеет этого суффикса» [59]. Numerals 100 'darš-al', 1000 'azar-al' have -al [60]. Cardinals inflect as though substantivized [gasanova1971: 147]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 šu-w-al šu-w-al 5 five five-EP-NUM magometov1982 58 transcription needs revision 31 Kajtag Kajtag language yes yes R-al unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker temirbulatova2004 18 «Числительное «20» гъайал//гъайил (литер, гъал) образуется посредством суффикса -ал, но в говорах встречаются и вариант гьайил. Числительные от двух до десяти, двадцать и сто оформлены словообразовательным суффиксом числительных -ал, -ел, как и в других диалектах, за исключением ицаринского и кубачинского. Суффикс -али оформляет сложные числительные, обозначающие круглые десятки, начиная с 30: гIявцIали «30», ухцIали «40», шуцIали «50», рекцIали «60», верцIали «70», гагьцIали «80», ирчIамцIали «90». Числительные, обозначающие сотни, образуются сложением неоформленных основ числительных, выражающих единицы и сотни: чIу + дарш «200» (чIу — косв. основа)». Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 угъал uʁ-al 4 four four-NUM temirbulatova2004 18 transcription needs revision 32 Chirag Chirag language yes yes R-al unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker ganenkov2021draft 15 «Cardinal numerals include underived words for numerals 1 to 10 as well as for 20, 100, and 1000. All underived numerals, except for ca ‘one’, have a short (root) form and a long form that consists of the short form followed by the suffix -al. Long forms are used in counting objects and as attributive modifiers within NPs. Short forms are used in complex numerals and to derive other classes of numerals. The names of decades from 30 to 90 are based on the short forms of corresponding unit names followed by the marker -c’ale. Complex two-digit numerals are based on the short form of the decade bearing the marker -nu with the corresponding unit bearing the marker -ra. The names of hundreds are based on the short form of the unit plus the word daršː ‘hundred’, which in complex expressions, also bears the marker -lib. The names of thousands have the identical structure but are based on the word azur ‘thousand’. Long forms of cardinal numerals inflect for case, when appearing in a headless NP. The numeral ca ‘one’, numerals that have the suffix -al, and nouns having the suffix -c’ale use the oblique stem marker -li to form oblique cases. Nouns that have the suffix -ra attach case suffixes directly to the numeral». Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 aʁʷ-al aʁʷ-al 4 four four-NUM ganenkov2021draft 15 33 Kubachi Kubachi language yes yes R-al unclear Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker magometov1963 134 «Кубачинские простые числительные не сохранили суффикса -al, который представлен в числительных других даргинских диалектов (за исключением числительного sa """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""один"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""")». Сложные числительные в кубачинском образуются посредством союзов nu и ja(<— ra): десять + союз nu + простое числительное + союз ja """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""и"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""", который может претерпеть изменения. В числительных """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""17"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" и """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""18"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" соединительный союз ja (<— ra) представлен полностью, а в остальных числительных его след сохранился в долготе исходного гласного ā. Союз rа """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""и"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" в сложных числительных выступает в других даргинских диалектах. Числительное „19"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" в кубачинском сохранило суффикс -al (аштинский говор — не сохранил), но при этом нет следа, наличия союза ja """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""и""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""»; '19' is wic̣-nu-ωūč̣um-al [135]. Десятки, начиная с """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""30""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""-ти до """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""ста"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""", в кубачинском диалекте, подобно сложным числительным, содержащим число """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""9"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" (19, 29…), сохранили суффикс -al (в других диалектах -ali): ωab-c̣-al """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""30"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""", aɣw-c̣-al """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""40"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""", x̃u-c̣-al """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""50""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""». But! '100' does not have -al: «Числительное dǟš „сто"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" также не имеет суффикса -al. Составные числительные образуются сочетанием простого числительного с сотней или тысячей». «dǟš „сто"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" и azij „тысяча"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" в сложных числительных в кубачинском диалекте стоят в форме дательного падежа» (suffix -li-j). Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 ēk e:k шесть six six magometov1963 134 34 Lak Standard Lak language yes yes R-CM-a emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker zhirkov1955 53 There is a class marker in the end of a numeral, undergoing phonetic changes (i.e. I-class /v/ alternates with lack of sound). It appears only once, it seems. When counting, -CM-a is not used [54]. Simple tens use ending -цIал-CM (is this our Dargwa friend, -al?), and complex tens look like this: мукь-цIал-ли арул-ва '47'. Forms 10—29 are derived like this: ацI-ния мукь-ва ‘14’, кьу-ния мукь-ва ‘24’. The ending -ния is said to be 'above'-case marker [55]. The class marker is always in the end, and it is present in all numerals up to 1000 and even 100 000. There is no evidence of numerals which do not have this class marker. II, IV-class consonant /r/ is said to correspond with /d/ in the beginning of words. Is it possible that emphatic -da underwent phonetic changes and then was reinterpreted as a class marker? This -da appears in '1000' азарда, where -ra dissimilates with final /r/ of the root and becomes /d/ [56]. II, IV-class consonant /r/ is said to correspond with /d/ in the beginning of words. Is it possible that emphatic -da underwent phonetic changes and then was reinterpreted as a class marker? This -da appears in '1000' азарда, where -ra dissimilates with final /r/ of the root and becomes /d/ [56]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 мукьва muq'-w.a 4 four four-CM.NUM zhirkov1955 53 transcription needs revision. There is no кь in the table of phonemes on page [7]. Judging by [8], there must be a typo in the table. Where кь /q'/ should be, there is another кI (row VI, column 6) 35 Archi Archi language yes yes R-au emphatic particle Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker kibrik1977 119 This is 'class form'. It is marked by a-CM-u when the short form (stem) ends with a consonant, and by ej-CM-u when it ends with a vowel. Exception: qI'˳e 'two' makes class forms qI'˳ewu (I), qI'˳eru (II). Also, os '1' does not receive class marker but it has a special form when impure: sej-CM-u (for example, in '31') [mikailov1967: 74]. [mikailov1967: 75] also points out that -u here is similar to Avar =go. The simple form of 'ten' is vic'-i-CM-u, complex numerals use the form moc'or. '20' and '100' have their own roots, tens 30—90 derive like: łib-ij-CM-u '30'; complex numeral looks like: łab-i-t:ur sej-CM-u. There is also a so-called «full form» of a cardinal, which is derived from the stem with the suffix -(t̄)or, which is plural marker for substantives. Units do not have this marker (it is said that the short form, a.k.a stem, and the full form of cardinals coincide for units.) -or is «characteristic» for moč'or '10' and boIš̄or '100' (I guess it means that this suffix is used only for these numerals, and -t̄or is used for others). In complex numerals, the last unit is in a class form, and the other digits are in full forms (for example, x̌̄o boIš̄-or x̌̄˳-ej-t'-u '505' [120]). Cardinals can be substantivized and inflected [121]. More info in [chumakina2021: 462]. This au is an emphatic particle but cardinals do not preserve emphatic meaning. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 x̌íbaru ɬib-au три [женщины] three [female] three-NUM kibrik1977 119 transcription needs revision 36 Lezgian Standard Lezgian language yes yes R-d class marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker haspelmath1993 230 -d is a «petrified old gender marker». sa(d) '1' and q'we(d) '2' can omit this suffix. They are used without -d when the numeral is used attributively in a noun phrase (for example, q'we xür 'two villages'). Forms with -d are used when substantivized or in counting. Numbers jaxc'ur '40', wiš '100', aǧzur '1000' and larger, apparently, do not have -d. '-d is not repeated in numerals 11–19 (-d is omitted in c'ud '10': c'i-q'wed '12') but it is repeated (for example, pud-q̃an-ni wad '65', glossed as 'three-twenty-plus five'; note that before -ni /d/ is assimilated into /n/ here). Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 irid iri-d 7 seven seven-NUM haspelmath1993 230 37 Tabasaran Standard Tabasaran language yes yes R-CM class marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker alekseevshixalieva2003 52 Actual class marker is only present at the end of numerals 2—20 (and complex numerals ending with it). In morpheme -цIу-р, which marks numerals 30—90, class marker is frozen as -r (хьу-цIу-р '50' glossed as 'five-ten-CM'). However, [magometov1965: 160] is rather inconsistent in terms of whether class marker here is frozen or not. In hundreds, class marker is attached to the number of hundreds but not to the hundreds themselves. Apparently, it's always -d in that position (for example, шубу-д-варж '300' glossed as 'three-CM-hundred'). The same goes for thousands. [alekseevetal1998: 369 (in the file)] notes about this: «Наблюдается также тенденция к утрате классных показателей – десятки, начиная с тридцати, классов не различают: сумцIур кас ‘тридцать человек’, сумчIур пеъ ‘тридцать куриц’, сумчIур йигъ ‘тридцать дней’». Numerals варж '100' and агъзур '1000' do not inflect by class. (Unclear if they used to.) In dialects of Tabasaran there are differences in inflection of numerals. When substantivized, cardinals inflect by case like nouns [alekseevetal1998: 369 (in the file)]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 йицIихьуб jic'i-xu-b пятнадцать fifteen ten-five-CM alekseevshixalieva2003 52 38 Agul Central Agul dialect_toplevel yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker magometov1970 94 There is a frozen class marker -d, which does not appear in adnominal positions. Many numerals also have frozen class markers in prefixes: j-/b-/w- [52]. Starting with 30, all numerals ending with tens, hundreds, etc. have -r instead of -d [96]. Class marker does not repeat [97]. Final class marker appears in substantivized forms only. In attributive positions class is omitted. When substantivized, cardinals inflect by case. If a class marker is present, it is omitted and replaced by -ji in oblique forms (followed by case suffixes), if there was no class marker, oblique suffix -a is attached before case suffixes (-di for millions). Substantivized cardinals can take plural forms with -ar [98]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 x̃ibu hᵊajwan xibu h:ajwan три лошади three horses three horse magometov1970 98 39 Qushan Agul Burshag village yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker magometov1970 95 There is a frozen class marker -r, which does not appear in adnominal positions [52]. It is present in Burshag idiom, whereas in other auls the marker is frozen as -d. Class marker does not repeat [97]. Final class marker appears in substantivized forms only. In attributive positions class is omitted. When substantivized, cardinals inflect by case. If a class marker is present, it is omitted and replaced by -ji in oblique forms (followed by case suffixes), if there was no class marker, oblique suffix -a is attached before case suffixes (-di for millions). Substantivized cardinals can take plural forms with -ar [98]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 sᵊar s:a-r один one one-NUM magometov1970 95 40 Tsakhur Mishlesh village yes yes R=CM=le mixed Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker kibrik1999 154 «Числительные 2—10, 20 и местоименное числительное 'сколько' имеют по два варианта образования. Краткая (иначе, счётная) форма имеет структуру «КОРЕНЬ+КЛАСС», например, хо=b 'пять', полная — КОРЕНЬ+КЛАСС+le», например, хо=b=lе 'пять'. Числительные 1, 100, 1000, 1000000 не имеют в своем составе ни классного показателя, ни морфемы =le. В числительных, имеющих классно-числовые показатели, используются показатели ряда =r/b/d (например, хо=b(-lе) 'пять'). В том случае, если корень оканчивается на согласный, между корнем и классным показателем появляется вставной гласный». Numerals ending with 2—10 and 20 also have the class marker [156]. Tens 30—90 do not have =CM(=le) either [155]. But =CM is also used in denoting the number of hundreds, thousands, etc. (for example, q'oI=d walš '200'). In such forms, only -d is used as a class marker as the numeral agrees with 'hundred' [155—156]. When denoting the number of thousands, the simple numeral is used in its full form, with =le (for example, q'oIlle millijon '2 000 000') [157]. [157—158] describes how short and full forms differ in semantics. In general, the full form is used as a numeral, and the short form is mostly used as a stem for other forms or complex numerals. It is noted that functions of =le are similar to those of attributivizer. In oblique cases, =le is changed to -ni. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 хеbɨllе xeb=ɨl=le 3 three three=CM=NUM kibrik1999 154 It seems that the class marker here is -d initially but it undergoes assimilation before /l/ and becomes -l. About assimilation: [alekseevetal1998: 398 (in the file)] 41 Rutul Mukhad dialect_toplevel yes yes R-CM class marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker ibragimov2004 75 All simple numerals and numerals ending with units have class marker except for sa 'one'. In class II numeral root хьиб does not have a class marker (<— хьиб-иб; gaplology? [mukhin2020: 10]). In complex numerals, only the last component of the numeral agrees with the corresponding noun. In tens 30—90 class marker is lost. Numerals ваьш '100', гьагъзыр '1000' do not have class marker. In hundreds and thousands, numerals denoting the number of hundreds and thousands agree with the words 'hundred' / 'thousand' (class IV). In attributive function, if the noun is in the oblique case, numerals are in genitive (except for sa '1' which does not inflect in this case) [76]. About Kina dialect: «With the head in an oblique case, cardinal numerals occur in the attributive form with the suffix -dɨ» [mukhin2020: 7]. «In a complex numeral, only the last numeral agrees in gender with the head. Numerals weš ‘hundred’, haʁzɨr ‘thousand’ morphologically behave like nouns; they do not take any gender markers. In a complex form, the numeral expressing the number of hundreds, thousands etc. agrees with them by taking Gender 4 marker -d» [mukhin2020: 11]. Also cardinals are often used instead of collective numerals [80]. [mukhin2020: 16] notices, «as a reaction to collective forms in a Russian stimulus (like troje (all two), dvoje (all three)), Rutul speakers tend to use simple cardinal forms». Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 кь'ва-б q'ˤʷa-b два (III кл.) two (class III) two-CM ibragimov2004 75 can also mean 'both' [page 80] 42 Budukh Budukh language yes yes R-CM class marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker talibov2007 145 Class markers for class I and II coincide (-r). Numerals ending with units, 10, 20, or 100 have class marker. '100' does not have a special word but rather derives as 'five-twenties'. Class marker is repeated to denote the number of the hundreds (and agrees with the word 'hundred' itself). Same for thousands [149]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 йукьуб juq'u-b четыре (III кл.) four (class III) four-CM talibov2007 145 transcription needs revision 43 Kryz Alik dialect_toplevel yes yes R-CM class marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker authier2009 104 «Les numéraux épithètes s’accordent à l’absolutif : sa-r furi ‘un homme’ ; sab xinib ‘une femme’ = sab barkan ‘un cheval’ = sab k’ul ‘une maison’ ; sad yiğ ‘un jour’ ; mais n’ont qu’une forme à partir du génitif quels que soient le cas et le genre : sunci fura, sunci xinibci, sunci barkanci, sunci k’ulci, sunci yiğin». Cardinals have oblique form which is originally genitive (for example, sab xinib ‘one woman’ => sunci xinibci). In oblique form, class marker is replaced by oblique marker -ci ('1' and '2' have special oblique forms.) Class marker repeats: şibqaʕa-r-na-yits’-ir '70' (as in sixty-CM-ADD-ten-CM). 1000 does not have class marker, apparently. -na us used for addition (for example, qaʕ -na-ts’in-na yuç’vu-d '39' as twenty-ADD-ten-ADD nine-CM). '100' is complex: fu-b-ğaʕ a-b as in 'five-CM-twenty-CM'. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 ri-xh-ir rix-ir 6 six six-CM authier2009 105 44 Udi Udi language yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker mobili2010 328 11—19 are derived like: са-цIцIе '11' (as in one-ten). 20—29 are derived like: са-кьо-вуй '29' (as in one-twenty-nine). Other tens are derived like: са-къо-вицI '30' (one-twenty-ten), пIа-къо '40' (two-twenty), etc. without exceptions. 100—900 are derived like: пIаъ-бач '200' (as in two-hundred). Cardinals are in plural when used with animate objects. When substantivized, can be inflected in case, receiving oblique-like suffix (for example, са 1' gives ergative сун-тI-ин, genitive сун-тI-ай, etc). When used as attributives, they do not inflect. [schulze1982: 140] states that in Nizh dialect some Azeri numerals can be used along with native ones (30—90). [starostin: 485] claims that there are three systems: the native one, the decimal one (influenced by Azeri), and the fully borrowed one (from Azeri). Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 пIацIе p'a-c'e 12 twelve two-ten mobili2010 328 45 Khinalug Khinalug language yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker desheriev1959 131 Components are binded with juxtaposition. Hundreds bind with -i (пан-и къан пхъу '125'). Precise rules are unclear, sometimes tens receive -i, sometimes hundreds do not. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 йаIаз-пхъу jaʔaz-pçu пятнадцать fifteen ten-five desheriev1959 131 transcription needs revision 46 Chechen Standard Chechen language yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker nichols1994 51 Vigesimal system. Components with the root ej- 'four' agree with the counted noun in class. Oblique form of the numeral is derived with a suffix (different for different final components, usually -na or -ʔa). When used attributively, numerals 1, 2, 3, and 5 have slightly different root morphs [jakovlev1960: 59]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 D-ej-tta CM-ej-t:a 14 fourteen four-ten nichols1994 51 uppercase D is standard notation for a class marker 47 Ingush Standard Ingush language yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker nichols2011 197 Vigesimal system. «The nominalized forms are used for enumeration, counting in the abstract, and doing arithmetic. They are also used as collectives, referring to a group as a set and used in apposition to a pronominal clause argument, usually a subject. In all their uses, they function as heads of numeral phrases. The nominative of the nominalized form differs from the attributive form in 1-3 and 5, in which a glottal stop is suffixed to the basic stem» [198]. Components with the root ej- 'four' agree with the counted noun in class. «Cardinals have separate attributive (adjectival) and nominalized forms. The attributive nominative is the basic stem, and the numerals 1-5 and 20 have oblique forms created by suffixing /-n/ or by vowel ablaut. The other numerals have a single invariant form that serves as both nominative and oblique. The attributive form modifies the quantified noun, agreeing with it in case and/or gender (if it can take those categories)». «'Thousand' is a loan from Persian, 'million' a loan from Russian. These behave morphosyntactically like nouns in some respects» [198]. About complex numerals, look [page 210]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 qo qo three three three three nichols2011 197 48 Tsova-Tush Zemo-Alvani village yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker holiskygagua1994 188 Vigesimal system (although nowadays numeral asi '100' comes from Georgian [desheriev1953: 189], atasi '1000' is also mentioned in [holiskygagua1994: 188]). All components 'four' (Dʕivʔ) have gender marker and agree with the counted noun. «When used alone, the numbers are declined in the same way as the other nominals». Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 Vʕivʔev v-ʕivʔ-ɛv four (males) four (males) CM-four-ERG holiskygagua1994 188 uppercase V is used to mark class 49 Kumyk Standard Kumyk language yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker abdullaevaetal2014 237 Tens 10—50 are sporadic. Cardinals can receive possessive suffixes (for example, уьчюбюз 'three of us') [231]. «Составные образуются согласно правилу: меньшее число, стоящее справа, выступает как множитель, а большее, стоящее слева, - как слагаемое: йигирма дёрт „двадцать четыре“, отуз беш „тридцать пять“, юз йигирма „сто двадцать“» [236]. «Количественные числительные по своей структуре и значению служат исходной для образования других разрядов числительных». When used as predicates, cardinals receive the predicate suffix. When inflecting, only the last component of the complex numerals changes. «Отмеченная способность категории принадлежности передавать широкий спектр предметных связей в сфере функционирования количественных числительных проявляется в том, что ее формы способны передавать значения партитивности (1) и собирательности (2): 1) Оланы беш-алтысы тар сокъмакъгъа раслаша (Б.Атаев) „Из них пятеро-шестеро попадают на узкую тропинку“. <…> 2) Уьчюбюз де ёлгъа тюшдюк (М.Ягьияев) „Все мы втроем отправились в путь“» [166]. «От имен числительных с помощью афф. -лыкъ образовано небольшое количество слов: бирлик «единство», биринчилик «первенство», онлукъ «десятка» [206]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 он беш on beš пятнадцать fifteen ten five abdullaevaetal2014 232 50 Azerbaijani Standard Azerbaijani language yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker shiralievsevortyan1971 71 Tens 10—50 are sporadic. Hundreds and thousands multiply by juxtaposition. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 он on десять ten ten shiralievsevortyan1971 71 51 Nogai Standard Nogai language yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker baskakov1996 332 Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 йырма jɯrma двадцать twenty twenty baskakov1996 332 52 Juhuri Juhuri language yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker authier2012 81 An old article by Chernij (1869/1905) has indications of a vigesimal system which is probably an influence of [East] Caucasian languages. Also: «les nombres ‘deux’ et ‘trois’ ont une forme redoublée qui s’emploie en isolation ou pour compter : yek, dü, se-se „un, deux, trois“» (no rules specified but there is an example). Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 çordeh čor-deh 14 fourteen four-ten authier2012 81 53 Eastern Armenian Eastern Armenian language yes yes R no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker dum-tragut2009 118 «Cardinal numbers never agree with the head noun in case, and always precede the head noun». «Cardinal numbers can also be nominalised. When nominalised the cardinal numbers inflect according to the i-declension, except the numeral 2. Similar to other compound terms, in compound cardinals only the second part inflects according to i-declension» [120]. Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 hing hing 5 five five dum-tragut2009 118 54 Georgian Standard Georgian language yes yes R-i no numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker Origin of the numeral marker hewitt1995 51 Most numerals have nominative marker -i, including large borrowed roots like 'billion'. There are two exceptions among the smaller numerals: rva '8' and cxra '9' (and all numerals ending with these). -i repeats in number of thousands and higher bases (for example, otx-i at-as cxr-as otx-m-oc-da-cxra-met’-i '4 999'). Maksim Melenchenko 2022-08-19 sam-i sam-i 3 three three-NOM hewitt1995 51